Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 73. Imitation Controlled Substances.

Cross references. —

For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see AS 12.47. For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.

Sec. 11.73.010.
Manufacture or delivery of an imitation controlled substance.

Except as provided in AS

11.73.050

, a person may not manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver, an imitation controlled substance.

Except as provided in AS

11.73.030

, a person who violates this section commits a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.73.020.
Possession of substance with intent to manufacture.

Except as provided in AS

11.73.050

, a person may not possess the following substances or their salts with the intent to manufacture an imitation controlled substance:

ephedrine;

ephedrine sulfate;

pseudoephedrine;

pseudoephedrine hydrochloride;

phenylpropanolamine;

caffeine;

theophylline;

lidocaine;

procaine;

tetracaine;

dyclonine;

acetaminophen;

salicylamide;

doxylamine;

diphenhydramine;

pheniramine;

chlorpheniramine; or

pyrilamine.

A person who violates this section commits a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.73.030.
Delivery of an imitation controlled substance to a minor.

Except as provided in AS

11.73.050

, a person 19 years of age or older may not deliver an imitation controlled substance to a person under 19 years of age, who is at least three years younger than the person delivering the substance.

A person who violates this section commits a class B felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.73.040.
Advertisement to promote the delivery of an imitation controlled substance.

Except as provided in AS

11.73.050

, a person may not knowingly place in a newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication, or post or distribute in a public place, an advertisement or solicitation knowing that the purpose of the advertisement or solicitation is to promote the delivery of an imitation controlled substance in the state.

A person who violates this section commits a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.73.050.
Imitation controlled substance as placebo.

No civil or criminal liability may be imposed under this chapter on a person who manufactures, delivers, possesses, or advertises or solicits to promote delivery of an imitation controlled substance solely for use as a placebo prescribed by a registered practitioner, as defined in AS

11.71.900

, in the course of professional practice or research.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

11.71.900

” was substituted for “AS

11.71.900

(19)” to reflect the renumbering in that section.

Sec. 11.73.060.
Forfeitures.

Property used during or in aid of a violation of this chapter may be forfeited to the state to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the provisions of AS

17.30.110

—

17.30.126

.

For purposes of this section the terms “controlled substance” and “this chapter”, as used in AS

17.30.110

—

17.30.126

, shall be construed as “imitation controlled substance” and “AS 11.73” respectively.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983)

Sec. 11.73.099.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“controlled substance” means a substance as defined in AS

11.71.900

(5);

“deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of an imitation controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship;

“imitation controlled substance” means a substance containing ephedrine, ephedrine sulfate, pseudoephedrine, pseudoephedrine hydrochloride, phenylpropanolamine, caffeine, theophylline, lidocaine, procaine, tetracaine, dyclonine, acetaminophen, salicylamide, doxylamine, diphenhydramine, pheniramine, chlorpheniramine, or pyrilamine, or their salts, that is not a controlled substance, and that by dosage unit appearance (including color, shape, size, and markings) and by representations would lead a reasonable person to believe that the substance is a controlled substance; the term “representations”, as used in this paragraph, includes

statements made by an owner or by anyone else in control of the substance concerning the nature of the substance, or its use or effect;

statements made to the recipient that the substance may be resold for inordinate profit;

whether the substance is packaged in a manner normally used for controlled substances;

evasive tactics or actions used by the owner or person in control of the substance to avoid detection by law enforcement authorities;

the storage, packaging, presentation, display of, or reference to a controlled substance with, near, or in connection with the activity involving the imitation controlled substance;

“manufacture” means the production, preparation, compounding, processing, encapsulating, packaging or repackaging, labeling or relabeling, of an imitation controlled substance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1983; am § 11 ch 76 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

11.71.900

(5)” was substituted for “AS

11.71.900

(4)” to reflect the renumbering of that paragraph.